src/morphology/incoming/verbtest.foma
###############################################
# Test compilation for verbs (stems, affixes) #
###############################################

# May want to use this if symbol pairs grow - needs foma
#set lexc-align ON

read lexc verbstems.lexc
def Stems

read lexc verb_inner_affixes.lexc
def InnerAffixes

read lexc verb_middle_affixes.lexc
def MiddleAffixes

read lexc verb_outer_affixes.lexc
def OuterAffixes

# Mark prefix type (insert corresponding flags to the
# original prefixes we know to be present from the lexical entry.
# ab=cd_ef.gh => ab@P.PREFIX.OUTER@=cd@P.PREFIX.MIDDLE@_ef@P.PREFIX.INNER@.gh

def MarkPrefixes ~$["@P.PREFIX.OUTER@"|"@P.PREFIX.INNER@"|"@P.PREFIX.MIDDLE@"] .o.
                  "=" -> "@P.PREFIX.OUTER@" "=" , 
                  "_" -> "@P.PREFIX.MIDDLE@" "_" , 
                  "." -> "@P.PREFIX.INNER@" ".";

# Insert . (inner), _ (middle), and = (outer) if missing in the intermediate rep:
# tsiy > =_.tsiy
# ts'á=zíd > ts'á=_.zíd
# tsí=di.tł'á > tsí=_di.tł'á
# gu.blah > =_gu.blah
# gu_blah > =gu_.blah

# (1) No . > insert . after last marker (= or _), or in the beginning if none exists
# (2) No _ > insert _ (a) after =, if one exists, or (b) beginning
# (3) No = > insert at beginning

def InsInner  [..] -> "." || "_" _ ~$"." .#. .o. 
              [..] -> "." || "=" _ ~$"." .#. .o. 
              [..] -> "." || .#. _ ~$"." .#. ;

def InsMiddle [..] -> "_" || "=" _ ~$["_"] .#. .o. 
              [..] -> "_" || .#. _ ~$["_"] .#. ; 

def InsOuter  [..] -> "=" || .#. _ ~$["="] .#. ;

read regex Stems .o. MarkPrefixes .o. InsInner .o. InsMiddle .o. InsOuter .o. 
            "." -> InnerAffixes , "_" -> MiddleAffixes , "=" -> OuterAffixes;

twosided flag-diacritics
def Grammar;

read lexc verbtags.lexc
def Tags

#read regex Grammar Tags ;

# Morphophonological rules
def PrefixV [a|e|i|o|u|į|ǫ|ų]; # This only includes prefix vowels

def hSyllabification E -> 0 || PrefixV h _ ;
def hEpenthesis E -> i h || .#. h _ [t|n|d];
def Epenthesis E -> i || _ h .o. E -> 0 || _ PrefixV .o. E -> [i|e];

#def tAbsorption t s ' E t -> t s E .o. c h ' e t -> c h e;
def tAbsorption ' E t -> E || t s | c h _ ;
def dAbsorption t s ' E d -> d z ; 

def tdReduction t -> 0 || _ d E ;
def tnReduction t (->) 0 || _ n E ;

# To prevent morphophonology to be tripped up be intervening flags
set flag-is-epsilon ON

# Rule ordering is determined below

regex [Grammar Tags] .o. hSyllabification .o. hEpenthesis .o. tdReduction .o. tAbsorption .o. dAbsorption .o. tnReduction .o. Epenthesis;

#eliminate flags

#echo ELIMINATE VALENCE
#eliminate flag VALENCE
#echo ELIMINATE TAMA
#eliminate flag TAMA
#echo ELIMINATE ASPECT
#eliminate flag ASPECT
#echo ELIMINATE SUBJECTPERSON
#eliminate flag SUBJECTPERSON
#echo ELIMINATE SUBJECTPERSON
#eliminate flag SUBJECTNUMBER
#echo ELIMINATE OBJECTNUMBER
#eliminate flag OBJECTNUMBER
#echo ELIMINATE DISTRIBUTIVE 
#eliminate flag DISTRIBUTIVE
